Idaho, session 2025, H0086.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 41, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4109B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4109B. ELECTRIC VEHICLE BUILDING PLAN REQUIREMENTS -- PREEMP-
TION. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
neither the state of Idaho nor any local government in Idaho shall adopt any
requirement that an electric vehicle (EV) charging station, a designated EV
parking space, an upgraded electrical conduit, or other infrastructure for
the purpose of EV charging station installation be included in a building
plan.
(2) This section supersedes any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules,
or regulations enacted by a political subdivision or municipality that re-
quires an EV charging station, a designated EV parking space, an upgraded
electrical conduit, or other infrastructure for the purpose of EV charging
station installation to be included in a building plan.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.